Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.49.010

Labor regulations—Safety regulations, discrimination in employment, hours, wages.

Provisions of state laws relating to labor and safety regulations as provided in Title 49 RCW shall apply to code cities to the same extent as such laws apply to other classes of cities.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.49.010.]